Utah statutes.
62A-7-202.   Location of detention facilities and services.

(1)  The division shall provide detention facilities and services in each county, or group of counties, as the population demands, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2)  The division, through its detention centers, is responsible for development, implementation, and administration of home detention services, and shall establish criteria for placement on home detention.

(3)  The division shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing standards for admission to secure detention and home detention programs.

(4)  The division shall provide training regarding implementation of the rules to law enforcement agencies, division employees, juvenile court employees, and other affected agencies and individuals upon their request.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

